Delaware, session 153, SB108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 222, Chapter 2, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 222. General definitions. (6) a. âDeadly weaponâ includes any of the following: 1. A firearm. 2. A bomb. 3. A knife of any sort, other than an ordinary pocketknife carried in a closed position. 4. A switchblade knife. 5. A billy. 6. A blackjack. 7. A bludgeon. 8. Metal knuckles. 9. A slingshot. 10. A razor. 11. A bicycle chain. 12. An ice pick. 13. A dangerous instrument, which is used, or attempted to be used, to cause death or serious physical injury. 14. A projectile weapon. b. For the purpose of this definition, âordinary pocketknifeâ means a folding knife having a blade not more than 3 3.75 inches in length. Section 2. Amend Subchapter VII, Chapter 5, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1446. Unlawfully dealing with a switchblade knife; unclassified misdemeanor. A person is guilty of unlawfully dealing with a switchblade knife when the person sells, offers for sale or has in possession a knife, the blade of which is released by a spring mechanism or by gravity. Unlawfully dealing with a switchblade knife is an unclassified misdemeanor.